Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1311
Selling agent, defined.

Selling agent shall mean any person, other than a commission merchant, who is engaged in the business of negotiating the sale and purchase of any farm product on behalf of a person engaged in farming operations.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 11.